Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.190

Time of filing—Availability—Penalty.

(1) Every regular report shall be filed with the director within thirty days from the date of issuance of the notice. Every special report shall be filed with the director within such time as shall be specified by him or her in the notice therefor.

(2) The director shall provide a copy of any regular report free of charge to any person that submits a written request for the report.

(3) Every bank which fails to file any report, required to be filed under subsection (1) of this section and within the time specified, shall be subject to a penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day's delay. A civil action for the recovery of any such penalty may be brought by the attorney general in the name of the state.

[ 2014 c 37 s 169. Prior: 1995 c 344 s 4; 1995 c 134 s 6; prior: 1994 c 256 s 51; 1994 c 92 s 61; 1977 c 38 s 1; 1955 c 33 s 30.08.190; prior: 1917 c 80 s 6; RRS s 3213. Formerly RCW 30.08.190.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.